Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FOREST LAKE; U.S. HIGHWAY 61 INTERSECTION IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $5,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for preliminary design, final design, engineering, right-of-way acquisition, and construction of improvements to the intersection of marked U.S. Highway 61 and Washington County State-Aid Highway 32 (11th Avenue) in the city of Forest Lake, including a roundabout and associated improvements to address safety, accessibility, and other traffic operations issues. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $5,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end